Utah statutes.
62A-15-104.   Director -- Qualifications.

(1)  The director of the division shall be appointed by the executive director.

(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in matters concerning substance abuse and mental health.

(3)  The director is the administrative head of the division.

